Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 358.915 is amended to read:
358.915. The provisions of ORS 192.005,  192.501 to 192.505, 273.990, 358.905 to 358.961 and
390.235 do not apply to a person  who unintentionally discovers an archaeological object that has
been exposed by the forces of nature on [ public land or ] private property and retains the object  for
personal use, except for sacred objects,  human remains, funerary objects or objects of cultural
patrimony.
SECTION 2.  ORS 358.924 is amended to read:
358.924. (1) Archaeological objects, funerary objects, human remains, sacred  objects and objects
of cultural patrimony that are held in violation of the provisions of ORS 358.920  or 390.235 are
contraband. A police officer shall seize all items declared to be  contraband under the provisions of
this section if the police officer has reasonable cause  to believe the items are held in violation of
the provisions of ORS 358.920 or 390.235.
(2) A law enforcement agency employing a police officer who seizes contraband items  under this
section shall give notice of the seizure to the district attorney for the county in  which the items
are seized  and the  Commission on Indian Services . The district attorney shall promptly investi-
gate to determine whether any person or Indian tribe  claims  the items seized. The commission
shall designate any appropriate Indian tribe and give notice to the tribe of the seizure.
(3) If any person claims items seized under this section, the district attorney shall file a  petition
with the  circuit court for the county for an expedited hearing on the claim. The court shall conduct
a hearing for the sole purposes of determining:
(a) Whether the items are archaeological objects, funerary objects, human remains,  sacred ob-
jects or objects of cultural patrimony;
(b) Whether any  arrowheads seized under this section were collected in compliance with ORS
358.920 (1)(b); and
(c) Whether a  person claiming an item other than an arrowhead can lawfully possess the item
under ORS 358.905 to 358.961.
(4) If items seized under this section are not claimed  by any person, or the circuit court deter-
mines that the items may not be returned to the claimant  under the provisions of subsection (3) of
this section:
(a) Archaeological objects shall be delivered to the Oregon State Museum  of Anthropology and
curated as described in ORS 358.920 (4)(a).
Enrolled Senate Bill 144 (SB 144-A) Page 1
(b) Funerary objects, human remains, sacred objects and objects of cultural  patrimony shall be
returned to the appropriate tribe for reinterment or other disposition as provided in ORS 358.940.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of  this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 358.905 to
358.961.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) If a district attorney of a county  declines to prosecute a violation of
ORS 358.920 or 390.235 for a reason other than insufficient admissible evidence, within 30
days of the declination the district  attorney shall give written notice of the declination to the
Attorney General. The notice must contain the reasons  underlying the declination to prose-
cute. Upon receipt  of the notice, the Attorney General may take full charge of any investi-
gation of, or prosecution for, conduct in violation of ORS 358.920 or 390.235.
(b) The Attorney General may require the aid and assistance of the district attorney  in
all matters pertaining to any  investigation or prosecution authorized under this section and
to the duties of the  Attorney General in the county in which the district attorney holds of-
fice.
(2) If the Attorney General chooses  to investigate or prosecute under this section, the
Attorney General shall have all the powers of a district attorney including:
(a) The power to issue subpoenas;
(b) The power to prepare charging instruments; and
(c) All  other powers incidental to an investigation or a prosecution authorized under this
section.
(3) All costs, fees and other expenses related to the investigation or prosecution author-
ized under this section shall be paid by the county in which the investigation or  prosecution
occurs, to the same extent as if conducted by the district attorney of that county.
(4) Except  as otherwise provided by law, a local law enforcement agency investigating a
violation of ORS  358.920 or 390.235 shall provide copies of all investigatory reports to the
Commission on Indian Services.
(5) The  power granted to the Attorney General by this section does not deprive a district
attorney of any authority or relieve a district attorney from any duty  to prosecute criminal
violations of law and advise  the officers of the county in which the district attorney holds
office.
Enrolled Senate Bill 144 (SB 144-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 25, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 25, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 144 (SB 144-A) Page 3